Massachusetts, session 194th, S2090.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 63 of the Mass General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 81 the
following new section: ---:
"Section __ Massachusetts Energy Credit for Corporations
Section 1) There shall be a tax credit assessed to Corporations for the total taxes owed by
a Corporation within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts on the basis of the creation of
renewable energies. The rate at which the credit shall be allocated is as follows:
0-14 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 0.7%;
15 - 20 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 1.4%;
21 - 30 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 2.1%;
31-40 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 2.8%;
of 2

41-50 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 3.5%;
51-60 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 4.2%;
61 - 70 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 4.9%;
61-80 Megawatts of Renewable Energy 5.6%;
81-90 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 6.3%;
91 - 100 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 7%;
101- 110 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 7.7%;
111-120 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 8.4%;
121 - 130 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 9.1%;
131- 140 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 9.8%; and
141-150 Megawatts of Renewable Energy: 10.5%.
Section 2. For purposes of this credit renewable energy shall include: Wind turbine
energy, Solar Panels, hydroelectric energy, Geo-Thermal Energy, and Nuclear Energy."
of 2